District of Columbia statutes.
21-323

Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278
1981 Ed., § 21-323.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 23 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.